Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.570

GOV central service account.

(1) The GOV central service account is created in the state treasury. The purpose of the account is to fund the office of equity as a revolving fund for the payment of salaries, wages, and other costs required for the operation and maintenance of statewide equity functions, and the activities in the office of equity. All receipts from agency fees and charges for services collected from public agencies must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) The director of financial management shall fix the terms and charges to agencies based on each agency's share of the office of equity statewide cost allocation plans for federal funds.

[ 2023 c 435 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 435: "Except for section 14 of this act, this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect July 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 435 s 15.]